en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Vehicle Safety & Security > Motorcycle Protective Gear > Motorcycle Helmets: Adventure & Dual-Sport Helmets; Full Face Helmets; Half Helmets; Modular Helmets; Off-Road Helmets; Open Face Helmets
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Sigurnost i zaštita vozila > Zaštitna oprema za motocikle > Motociklističke kacige: Kacige za avanturističke i dvonamjenske motocikle; Kacige za cijelo lice; Kacige preko pola lica; Modularne kacige; Terenske kacige; Kacige s otvorenim licem
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Защитная экипировка и товары для обеспечения безопасности транспортных средств > Защитная экипировка для мотоциклистов > Мотоциклетные шлемы: Мотошлемы эндуро и дуал-спорт; Закрытые шлемы (интегралы); Открытые шлемы 1/2 (половинки); Комбинированные шлемы (модуляры); Кроссовые шлемы; Открытые шлемы 3/4
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Fordonssäkerhet > Skyddsutrustning för motorcykel > Motorcykelhjälmar: Äventyrs- och dual-sport-hjälmar; Helansiktshjälmar; Halvhjälmar; Modulära hjälmar; Terränghjälmar; Öppna ansiktshjälmar
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Безопасност и сигурност на превозни средства > Защитна екипировка за мотоциклети > Каски за мотоциклет: Каски за приключенски и dual-sport мотори; Интегрални каски; Половин каски; Модуларни каски; Моторкрос каски; Отварящи се каски
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Køretøjssikkerhed > Beskyttelsesudstyr til motorcykler > Motorcykelhjelme: Adventure- og dual-sport-hjelme; Hjelme til hele ansigtet; Hjelme til halvt ansigt; Modulære hjelme; Off-road-hjelme; Åbne hjelme
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Taşıt Güvenliği ve Emniyeti > Motosiklet Koruyucu Ekipmanları > Motosiklet Kaskları: Macera ve dual-sport kaskları; Tam Yüz Kasklar; Yarım Kasklar; Modüler Kasklar; Arazi Kaskları; Açık Yüz Kaskları
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Varnost in zaščita vozil > Zaščitna oprema za motorna kolesa > Motoristične čelade: Čelade za pustolovske ter terenske in cestne športe; Celoobrazne čelade; Polovične čelade; Modularne čelade; Čelade za motokros; Odprte čelade
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Ajoneuvon turvallisuus > Suojavarusteet moottoripyöräilyyn > Moottoripyöräkypärät: Seikkailu- ja dual-sport-kypärät; Koko pään peittävät kypärät; Puolikypärät; Modulaariset kypärät; Maastokypärät; Kasvoista avoimet kypärät
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Seguridad y protección para vehículos > Equipo de protección para motocicletas > Cascos para motocicletas: Cascos duales y de aventura; Cascos integrales; Medios cascos; Cascos modulares; Cascos todoterreno; Cascos abiertos
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Segurança e proteção para veículos > Equipamento de proteção para motas > Capacetes para motas: Capacetes de aventura e dual-sport; Capacetes integrais; Capacetes abertos; Capacetes modulares; Capacetes todo-o-terreno; Capacetes de frente aberta
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Siguranța și securitatea vehiculelor > Echipament de protecție pentru motociclete > Căști de motocicletă: Căști moto de aventură și dual-sport; Căști integrale pentru motocicletă; Căști semi-deschise pentru motocicletă; Căști modulare; Căști off-road; Căști deschise
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > ความปลอดภัยและการรักษาความปลอดภัยรถยนต์ > อุปกรณ์ป้องกันสำหรับจักรยานยนต์ > หมวกกันน็อกสำหรับจักรยานยนต์: หมวกกันน็อกสไตล์แอดเวนเจอร์และดูอัลสปอร์ต; หมวกกันน็อกเต็มใบ; หมวกกันน็อกครึ่งใบ; หมวกกันน็อกยกคาง; หมวกกันน็อกออฟโรด; หมวกกันน็อกแบบเปิดหน้า
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Bezpečnost a zabezpečení vozidel > Motocyklové ochranné pomůcky > Motocyklové helmy: Enduro a cestovní helmy; Integrální helmy; Otevřené poloviční helmy; Modulární helmy; Off-road helmy; Otevřené helmy
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Kjøretøysikkerhet > Beskyttelsesutstyr for motorsykkel > Motorsykkelhjelmer: Adventure- og dual-sport-hjelmer; Helhjelmer; Halvhjelmer; Modulære hjelmer; Offroad-hjelmer; Åpne hjelmer
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 车辆安全防盗用品 > 摩托车护具 > 摩托车头盔: 探险和双重运动头盔; 全盔; 半盔; 模块化头盔; 越野头盔; 开口盔
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 車輛安全 > 重機護具 > 摩托車安全帽: 冒險與多功能安全帽; 全罩式安全帽; 半罩式安全帽; 模組化安全帽; 越野安全帽; 罩式安全帽
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Sicurezza e protezioni per veicoli > Abbigliamento protettivo da moto > Caschi da moto: Caschi adventure e dual sport; Caschi integrali; Caschi a metà faccia; Caschi modulari; Caschi fuoristrada; Caschi aperti
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Sécurité des véhicules > Equipements de protection moto > Casques de moto: Casques d'aventure et dual-sport; Casques intégraux; Demi-casques; Casques modulaires; Casques tout-terrain; Casques sans visière
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Veiligheid en bescherming voor voertuigen > Beschermende motoruitrusting > Motorhelmen: Adventure- en dual-sport-helmen; Integraalhelmen; Halve helmen; Modulaire helmen; Offroad-helmen; Open helmen
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Bezpečnosť a zabezpečenie vozidla > Chrániče pre motocykle > Motocyklistické prilby: Prilby pre dobrodružné a duálne športy; Celotvárové prilby; Polovičné prilby; Modulárne prilby; Enduro prilby; Prilby s otvorenou tvárovou časťou
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Zabezpieczenia pojazdów > Ochraniacze motocyklowe > Kaski motocyklowe: Kaski motocyklowe adventure i dual-sport; Kaski pełnotwarzowe; Półkaski; Kaski modułowe; Kaski terenowe; Kaski otwarte
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > An toàn và an ninh xe cộ > Đồ bảo hộ khi đi mô tô > Mũ bảo hiểm mô tô: Mũ bảo hiểm Adventure và Dual-Sport; Mũ bảo hiểm cả mặt; Mũ bảo hiểm nửa đầu; Mũ bảo hiểm mô-đun; Mũ bảo hiểm địa hình; Mũ bảo hiểm hở mặt
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Járműbiztonság és -védelem > Motorkerékpár-védőfelszerelés > Motorkerékpár-sisakok: Kaland- és túraenduró-sisakok; Teljes arcú sisakok; Fél sisakok; Moduláris sisakok; Off-road sisakok; Nyitott arcú sisakok
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 乗り物の安全・防犯関連用品 > バイク用安全装備 > バイク用ヘルメット: アドベンチャー＆デュアルスポーツヘルメット; フルフェイスヘルメット; ハーフヘルメット; モジューラーヘルメット; オフロードヘルメット; オープンフェイスヘルメット
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Segurança de veículos > Equipamentos de proteção para motociclistas > Capacetes para motociclistas: Capacetes adventure e dual-sport; Capacetes fechados; Meio capacetes; Capacetes modulares; Capacetes cross; Capacetes abertos
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Transporto priemonių sauga ir apsauga > Apsaugos priemonės motociklininkams > Motociklininkų šalmai: Nuotykių ir dvigubos paskirties motociklų šalmai; Veidą dengiantys šalmai; Pusiniai šalmai; Moduliniai šalmai; Bekelės šalmai; Šalmai atviru veidu
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Fahrzeugsicherheit > Motorrad-Schutzausrüstung > Motorradhelme: Adventure- & Dual-Sport-Helme; Integralhelme; Halbschalenhelme; Modularhelme; Offroad-Helme; Offene Helme
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ασφάλεια & προστασία οχημάτων > Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός μοτοσυκλέτας > Κράνη μοτοσυκλέτας: Κράνη Adventure & Dual-Sport; Κράνη Full Face; Κράνη που καλύπτουν μόνο το επάνω μέρος του κεφαλιού; Αρθρωτά κράνη; Κράνη εκτός δρόμου; Ανοιχτά κράνη
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 차량 안전/보안 > 오토바이 보호 장비 > 오토바이 헬멧: 어드벤처 및 듀얼 스포츠 헬멧; 풀 페이스 헬멧; 하프 헬멧; 모듈러 헬멧; 오프로드 헬멧; 오픈 페이스 헬멧